Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB875.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9122.2(b)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsections (a) and (b) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 9122.2. Clean slate limited access.(a) General rule.--The following shall be subject to limited access:* * *(1.2) Subject to whether a court has vacated an order for limited access under section 9122.4 (relating to order to 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 vacate order for limited access), criminal history record information pertaining to a conviction that rendered an individual eligible for the motivational boot camp program under 61 Pa.C.S. § 3905 (relating to m otivational boot camp program ), if a person successfully completed the motivational boot camp program in accordance with 61 Pa.C.S. § 3907 (relating to c ompletion of motivational boot camp program ), for three years following program completion for misdemeanor offenses and has been free of conviction for any offense punishable by imprisonment for one or more years and if payment of all court-ordered restitution has occurred. Upon payment of all court-ordered restitution, the person whose criminal history record information is subject to limited access under this paragraph shall also pay the fee previously authorized to carry out the limited access and clean slate limited access provisions.(1.3) Subject to whether a court has vacated an order for limited access under section 9122.4, criminal history record information pertaining to a conviction that rendered an individual eligible for the motivational boot camp program under 61 Pa.C.S. § 3905, if a person successfully completed the motivational boot camp program in accordance with 61 Pa.C.S. § 3907, and for five years following program completion for felony offenses has been free of conviction for any offense punishable by imprisonment for one or more years and if payment of all court-ordered restitution has occurred. Upon payment of all court-ordered restitution, the person whose criminal history record information is subject to limited access under this paragraph shall also pay the fee previously authorized to carry out the limited access and 20250SB0875PN0976 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clean slate limited access provisions.* * *(b) Procedures.--(1) On a monthly basis, the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall transmit to the Pennsylvania State Police central repository the record of any conviction eligible for limited access under subsection (a)(1), (1.2) or (1.3).* * *(6) Within 30 days of a person becoming eligible under subsection (a)(1.2) or (1.3), the Department of Corrections shall certify to the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts the person's successful completion of the motivational boot camp program.* * *Section 2. The definition of "eligible inmate" in section 3903 of Title 61 is amended to read:§ 3903. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible inmate." [A person sentenced to a term of confinement under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections who is serving a term of confinement, the minimum of which is not more than two years and the maximum of which is five years or less, or an inmate who is serving a term of confinement, the minimum of which is not more than three years where that inmate is within two years of completing his minimum term, and who has not reached 40 years of age at the time he is 20250SB0875PN0976 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved for participation in the motivational boot camp program. The term shall not include any inmate who is subject to a sentence the calculation of which included an enhancement for the use of a deadly weapon as defined pursuant to the sentencing guidelines promulgated by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, any inmate who has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent of any crime listed under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders) or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders) or any inmate with a current conviction or a prior conviction within the past ten years for 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder), drug trafficking as defined in section 4103 (relating to definitions) or a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second or subsequent offenses) or criminal attempt, criminal solicitation or criminal conspiracy to commit any of these offenses.] A person who has not been designated by a sentencing judge as ineligible and to whom the following apply:(1) The person has not been convicted or adjudicated delinquent of any crime listed under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders) or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders).(2) The person is not currently convicted or has not been convicted within the past 10 years of a crime listed under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 25 (relating to criminal homicide).(3) The person is not subject to a sentence of which included an enhancement for the use of a deadly weapon as defined pursuant to law or the sentencing guidelines promulgated by the commission.(4) The person is not awaiting trial or sentencing for 20250SB0875PN0976 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional criminal charges. This does not include a traffic citation which is classified as summary offense under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(5) The person has been sentenced to a term of confinement under the jurisdiction of the department, the minimum of which is not more than two years, or a person who is serving a term of confinement, the minimum of which is not more than five years where the person is within two years of completing the person's minimum term.* * *Section 3. Sections 3904(b) and (c), 3905(d), 3906, 3907 and 3909 of Title 61 are amended to read:§ 3904. Selection of inmate participants.* * *(b) Duties of sentencing judge.--The sentencing judge shall employ the sentencing guidelines to identify those defendants who are eligible for participation in a motivational boot camp. The judge shall have the discretion to exclude a defendant from eligibility if the judge determines that the defendant would be inappropriate for placement in a motivational boot camp. The judge shall note on the sentencing order whether the defendant has been excluded from eligibility for a motivational boot camp program. When determining whether the defendant is eligible, the sentencing judge shall consider the following:(1) Whether the defendant's participation in a motivational boot camp is consistent with the safety of the community.(2) Whether the defendant's participation in a motivational boot camp is consistent with the welfare of the individual.20250SB0875PN0976 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Whether the defendant's participation in a motivational boot camp is consistent with the objectives of the department.(4) The health and physical condition of the defendant.(5) The defendant's criminal history.(6) The defendant's escape history.(7) The defendant's institutional adjustment during prior incarcerations.(8) Outstanding detainers or parole warrants, or both, for the defendant.(9) The defendant's psychological profile.(10) The position of a victim of the defendant's crime, as advised by the prosecuting attorney, on the eligibility of the defendant.(11) The position of the prosecuting attorney on the eligibility of the defendant.(12) Whether the defendant will sign a memorandum of understanding agreeing to the terms of the motivational boot camp program.(c) Duties of department.--[The secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations providing for inmate selection criteria and the establishment of motivational boot camp selection committees within each diagnostic and classification center of the department.] Following a determination by the sentencing judge, the eligible inmate shall be placed in the motivational boot camp program unless the selection committee and the department finds that the admittance of the eligible inmate is substantially more likely than not inconsistent with the safety of the community and the welfare of the applicant. The department shall promptly notify, in writing, the court, the 20250SB0875PN0976 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eligible inmate and the attorney for the Commonwealth, of the placement or denial of placement of the eligible inmate.* * *§ 3905. Motivational boot camp program.* * *(d) Approval.--Motivational boot camp programs may be established [only at correctional institutions classified by the secretary as motivational boot camp institutions.] as follows:(1) The department shall establish a motivational boot camp, which shall operate at a correctional institution that operated a motivational boot camp on or before January 1, 2025, and the institution is located in a county of the sixth class with a population between 80,000 and 81,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(2) (Reserved).§ 3906. Procedure for selection of participant in motivational boot camp program.[(a) Application.--An eligible inmate may make an application to the motivational boot camp selection committee for permission to participate in the motivational boot camp program.](a.1) Memorandum of understanding required.--An eligible inmate that seeks admission into the motivational boot camp program shall sign a memorandum of understanding agreeing to the terms of the motivational boot camp program. The memorandum of understanding shall be transmitted to the selection committee for the eligible inmate's admittance to the program.(b) Selection.--[If the selection committee determines that an inmate's participation in the program is consistent with the safety of the community, the welfare of the applicant, the 20250SB0875PN0976 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 programmatic objectives and the rules and regulations of the department,] Unless the committee determines that admittance of the eligible inmate is substantially more likely than not inconsistent with the safety of the community and the welfare of the applicant, the committee shall forward [the application] all information associated with the eligible inmate to the secretary or his designee for approval [or disapproval].(c) Conditions.--Applicants may not participate in the motivational boot camp program unless they agree to be bound by all the terms and conditions thereof and indicate their agreement by signing a memorandum of understanding.(d) Qualifications to participate.--Satisfaction of the qualifications set forth in this section to participate does not mean that an inmate will automatically be permitted to participate in the program.(e) Expulsion from program.--(1) An inmate's participation in the motivational boot camp unit may be suspended or revoked for administrative or disciplinary reasons.(2) The department shall develop regulations consistent with this subsection.§ 3907. Completion of motivational boot camp program.Upon certification by the department of the inmate's successful completion of the program, the Pennsylvania Board of Probation and Parole shall immediately release the inmate on parole, notwithstanding any minimum sentence imposed in the case. [The parolee will be subject to intensive supervision for a period of time determined by the board, after which the parolee will be subject to the usual parole supervision.] The entire term of confinement that rendered the participant 20250SB0875PN0976 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eligible to participate in the motivational boot camp program shall be deemed to have been served. For all other purposes, the parole of the inmate shall be as provided by Chapter 61 (relating to Pennsylvania Board of Probation and Parole).§ 3909. Evaluation.The department and the commission shall monitor and evaluate the motivational boot camp program to ensure that the programmatic objectives are met. The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee, in collaboration with the department and the commission, shall present an annual report to the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives no later than February 1 of each year. The annual report shall include the following:(1) The one-year recidivism rate of the motivational boot camp program. (2) The three-year recidivism rate of the motivational boot camp program.(3) The annual number of GEDs granted amongst participants of the motivational boot camp program.(4) The cost savings associated with the motivational boot camp program.(5) Any other information the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee deems necessary.Section 4. The definition of "eligible person" in section 4103 of Title 61 is amended to read:§ 4103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *20250SB0875PN0976 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Eligible person."(1) A person who has not been designated by the sentencing court as ineligible and is a person convicted of a drug-related offense who:(i) Has undergone an assessment performed by the Department of Corrections, which assessment has concluded that the person is in need of drug and alcohol addiction treatment and would benefit from commitment to the State drug treatment program and that placement in the State drug treatment program would be appropriate.(ii) Does not demonstrate a history of present or past violent behavior.(iii) Is a person sentenced to a term of confinement under the jurisdiction of the department, the minimum of which is not more than two years, or a person who is serving a term of confinement, the minimum of which is not more than five years where the person is within two years of completing the person's minimum term.(iv) Provides written consent permitting release of information pertaining to the person's participation in the State drug treatment program.(2) The term shall not include a person who is subject to a sentence the calculation of which includes an enhancement for the use of a deadly weapon, as defined pursuant to law or the sentencing guidelines promulgated by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, a person who has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent of any crime listed under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders) or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders) or a person with a current conviction or a 20250SB0875PN0976 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior conviction within the past ten years for 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder), drug trafficking as defined in this section or a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second or subsequent offenses) or criminal attempt, criminal solicitation or criminal conspiracy to commit any of these offenses.(2.1) The term shall not include a person who is actively participating in the motivational boot camp program established under section 3905 (relating to motivational boot camp program). This paragraph does not preclude an individual from being eligible after completion or expulsion from the motivational boot camp program.* * *Section 5. Title 61 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5912. Report on incarcerated individuals with certain health conditions.The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall conduct a study, in collaboration with the department, the Department of Human Services, the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts and the commission, on the incarceration of individuals with certain health conditions, to which the following shall apply:(1) The study shall include the following information:(i) The number of inmates currently in a State correctional institution in this Commonwealth who have a terminal illness or a seriously deteriorating medical condition that is not compatible with the traditional incarceration setting.(ii) Aggregate costs associated with an inmate with a terminal illness or seriously deteriorating medical condition that is not compatible with the traditional 20250SB0875PN0976 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incarceration setting and the difference from an inmate without a terminal illness or a seriously deteriorating medical condition that is not compatible with the traditional incarceration setting , which shall include any reimbursements from Federal and State entities.(iii) Aggregate information related to the severity of the offense for individuals with a terminal illness or a seriously deteriorating medical condition that is not compatible with the traditional incarceration setting, including the statutory grading, offense gravity score, prior record score and the length of sentence.(iv) The ability, potential cost savings and benefits of using a nontraditional correctional setting for the incarceration of inmates with terminal illness or a seriously deteriorating medical condition, which shall include the consideration of the correctional institution that operates a motivational boot camp program established under section 3905 (relating to motivational boot camp program).(v) Best practices from other states related to the incarceration of individuals with certain health conditions.(vi) Any other information the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee deems relevant.(2) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall submit a report of its findings to the General Assembly under paragraph (1) no later than March 31, 2026.Section 6. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The amendment of 61 Pa.C.S. § 3905(d).20250SB0875PN0976 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The addition of 61 Pa.C.S. § 5912.This section.(2) The amendment of 18 Pa.C.S. § 9122.2 shall take effect in 180 days.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0875PN0976 - 13 - 123456